[1]         The
Plaintiff, Nexus Solutions Inc. (“Nexus”), is a software development firm
located in the City of London.  Nexus’ president is Joseph Sue-Tang (“Joseph”). 
Nexus was incorporated on September 20, 1999.
[2]        The
Defendant, Vladimir Krougly (“Vlad”), was born on April 3, 1975.  Vlad was a
software developer at Nexus from its inception until his departure on January
4, 2011. The Defendant, Daria Krougly (“Daria”) is Vlad’s wife.  Vlad and Daria
incorporated the Defendant Advanced Consulting and Technology Group Inc. (“ACT
Group”) on November 22, 2004.  Vlad and Daria were each 50% shareholders of ACT
Group.
[3]         The
Defendant Serge Bays (“Serge”) is Daria’s younger brother.  He was born on
December 20, 1988.  Serge was employed briefly by Nexus during the summer
months in 2007 as an intern.  During the relevant time period, Serge was a computer
engineering  student at Western University (“UWO”).
[4]        The
Defendant Limesoft Inc. (“Limesoft”) is a company that was incorporated by
Serge on December 1, 2009.
[5]        At
this juncture, this portion of the dispute between these parties centres upon
copyright law only.
[6]        The
subject matter of this case is continuous emissions monitoring software
(“CEMS”).  CEMS is used to monitor smokestack emissions.  CEMS monitors and
tracks the compounds in the emissions produced by heavy industry for
environmental purposes.
[7]        Nexus’
product is called “CEMView”.
[8]        Nexus
alleges that Vlad, while employed at Nexus, developed competing CEMS software
with the assistance of Serge, which they then marketed and sold through
Limesoft in competition to CEMView.  The Limesoft product is called “Limedas”,
which is an acronym for Live Measurement Data Acquisition System.
[9]        Vlad
and Serge deny that Limedas was developed while Vlad was in the course of his
employment at Nexus or relying upon any proprietary source code belonging to
Nexus.  They assert that Serge independently developed Limedas as part of his
fourth-year engineering project at UWO.
[10]      On
consent of the parties, Grace J. bifurcated the trial.  The trial before me was
to address the following issues:
[11]      A
number of issues were left to be determined at later proceedings, depending
upon the outcome of this part of the trial.
[12]      The
parties filed a Partial Agreed Statement of Facts.  A total of seven witnesses
testified, including Joseph, Vlad, Serge, and four experts.  This was a very
document intensive case, with 316 exhibits.  I note that I issued sealing
orders with respect to the proprietary source code that was offered into
evidence.
[13]      At the
outset, I provide some description of the concepts that were presented by the
parties.  Prior to trial, most of these concepts were entirely foreign to the
court.
[14]      As
noted, CEMS software is intended to collect information from smokestacks and
generate reports for regulatory authorities.  Instruments called process
analyzers located on a smokestack continuously sample the emissions from the
smokestack.  There are many compounds that are typically measured and
recorded.  The CEMS software is used to acquire data about these compounds from
the process analyzers.  In this case, the analyzers were developed primarily
from a German company called “SICK”.
[15]      The
analyzers have to communicate the data acquired from the smokestacks with the
software through the use of “communication protocols”.  Nexus’ product,
CEMView, relied on a communication protocol developed by OPC Foundation Inc.  Nexus
pays annual dues to be a member of OPC Foundation.  The protocol was called
“OPC” or “OPC Classic” and the coding used by CEMView was considered “OPC
compliant”.  “OPC UA” was an upgraded communication protocol that Nexus was
interested in using with their CEMView products in the future.  OPC UA was
first introduced in approximately 2006.
[16]      The software
of both Nexus and Limesoft was written using source code.  Source code is
created by a computer programmer to instruct a computer how to execute its
functions.  Source code is a set of instructions, written in language that the
computer can understand.  Source code is human-readable by those that
understand it.  There are many different languages, such as C++ and C#.
[17]      CEMView
was written using C++ source code.  Limedas was written in C# source code.  C# became
available later than C++.
[18]      Source
code control systems are used to track the development of source code.  As the
source code is written or modified by the programmer, it is “checked in” and
stored in the source code control system.  Source code that has been checked-in
is called a “commit”.  This system allows the software developer to revert back
to an earlier version of the source code if there are problems, or “bugs” found
in a later version.  The source code control system records the time and day of
the commit and a username associated with the programmer who wrote the source
code that was checked in.  The programmer may also include a comment to explain
the nature of the source code being committed.   Thus, the source code control
system allows others to review the changes made to the source code, to see when
the changes were made and who made them.
[19]      Nexus’
source code control system was called Visual Source Safe and was originally
kept on a computer called “Builder”.  Over time, Nexus has updated its source
code control system.  Thus, subsequent computers containing the source code
control system have been called “Builder 2”, “Builder 3” and finally “TFS”.
[20]      Limesoft
did not keep its source code on a local server.  Rather, Limesoft set up an
account through “Unfuddle”, which allows its customers to store source code in
online “repositories” for a monthly fee.  There were seven Unfuddle
repositories referenced in this case and used by Limesoft.
[21]      In
software development, “tickets” are used to assign tasks to various members of
the software development team.  In this case, the CEMView tickets were made an
exhibit, as were the Limedas tickets.  The ticket is given an “ID number”, for
example ID:4, and these ID numbers are chronological.  The date that the ticket
is assigned and closed is noted.  The person to whom the task is assigned is
identified, as well as the person assigning the ticket.  The nature of the assignment
is also described.
[22]      One of
the key documents in this case is Exhibit 108.  This was a chart created by
Joseph that lists the 848 commits that were made across the seven Unfuddle
repositories, in chronological order between June 22, 2009, and March 22, 2011. 
An individual commit can also be described as a “revision” meaning a change was
made to the source code (either an Addition, Deletion or Modification).
[23]      The
individual revisions (or “changesets”) made in each of the seven Unfuddle
repositories were also available in separate exhibits.  Thus, for example, in
the “Tools” repository, the following entry is noted:
[24]      This
shows that on June 22, 2009, revision 2 was made at 7:26 pm by someone using
the username “vlad”.  The specific changes, but not the actual source code, are
then listed below the revision.  It is possible to see if source code was added
(A), deleted (D) or modified (M).  The revision also identifies the language
that the source code is written in.  For example, “.cs” means C#.  There is
also a brief description of the purpose of the revision.  For revision 2, it
states:
[25]      Importantly,
it was described, and I find, that a commit can be done by the simple press of a
button and is not to be confused with the actual writing of the source code,
which can take hours to author.
[26]      Joseph
Sue-Tang is a certified professional mechanical engineer.  After graduating
from UWO he worked for several years and then returned to the University of
Waterloo where he obtained his master’s degree in system design engineering. 
He then worked as a consultant through a company called JST Engineering.
[27]      In
approximately 1992, Joseph was introduced to CEM Specialities, located in
Komoka, near London, Ontario.  While working on a project through CEM
Specialities, he developed a system that would collect emissions data and
generate reports.
[28]      Joseph
incorporated Nexus Solutions.  He met Vlad, and Vlad’s brother Alexandre
Krougly (“Alexandre”), who joined Nexus as software programmers in 1999.  Nexus
Solutions’ main project was continuous emissions monitoring systems.  Nexus had
clients in approximately 40 countries worldwide.
[29]      Nexus
originally had six shareholders.  This included Joseph, Vlad and Alexandre.  Joseph
had the largest holdings of shares—22.5%.  Each Vlad and Alexandre had 12.5%. 
In 2001, Joseph acquired additional shares through his company JST Engineering
from some of the remaining shareholders.  In  2004, JST Engineering acquired
further shares as other shareholders departed.  Thus, by 2004, Joseph
effectively controlled 75% of the shares and each of Vlad and Alexander
controlled 12.5%.
[30]      As of
February 23, 2004, Vlad became the Secretary of Nexus and Alexander was its
Treasurer.  Joseph was President.
[31]      Other
members of Joseph’s family were also involved with Nexus.  Victor Sue-Tang
(“Victor”), Joseph’s brother, also worked for Nexus and frequently assigned
work to Nexus employees, as well as dealt with matters such as sales and
trouble shooting for clients.  Joseph’s wife worked for Nexus.  In addition to
the Sue-Tangs, there were as many as three to five software developers working
for Nexus at any given time.
[32]      Vlad
and Alexandre initially billed their time to Nexus for their work.  At first, this
was done through a company called Elite Technologies Limited.  On November 22,
2004, Vlad and Daria incorporated ACT Group.  ACT Group billed Nexus for Vlad’s
services from December 2004 until July 4, 2006.  There was no written contract
between ACT Group and Nexus.
[33]      On
July 4, 2006, Vlad became an employee of Nexus.  Vlad testified that it was
Joseph that wanted everyone to be employees and not contractors.  Vlad was not
in favour of this proposal but did not resist nor express his dissatisfaction
to Joseph.  Thereafter, Vlad was paid an annual salary plus bonuses, as
follows:
[34]      Alexandre
was also a paid employee of Nexus during that time.  He had more of a
supervisory role than the other employees, and I find was in more of a
supervisory role than Vlad.
[35]      In
June of 2008, Vlad sold all of his shares in Nexus to JST Engineering Inc. and
resigned as an officer and director.  The sale price was approximately
$125,000.  Vlad testified that he was presented with a draft shareholder
agreement which would redistribute shares and he decided he would rather sell
his shares.  He testified that he did not wish to sign the draft shareholder
agreement because it contained a non-compete clause.  He did not discuss his
concern with that clause with Joseph.
[36]      Vlad officially
resigned from Nexus on December 13, 2010, effective January 4, 2011.  He agreed
upon his departure to return Nexus property and delete and/or destroy all
copies of Nexus’ software on all personal computers or other electronic
devices.
[37]      As
noted, Nexus’ CEMView is used to monitor smokestack emissions.  CEMView acquires
the data about the emissions from the process analyzers and records the time
the data is received and the value of the sampled data.  The data acquisition
component of CEMView which implements the analyzer specific communication
protocol is called an “OPC Server”.
[38]      Analyzing
the data included providing averages of emissions using different intervals,
such as 1-minute, 6-minute, hourly or daily.  It also recorded the quantity of
emissions being emitted in any given time.  The data analysis component of
CEMView is called the “CEMView Server”.
[39]      CEMView
created a method of presenting the emissions data to its customers.  The data
would be presented to the end user in visual form on a computer screen.  The
data presentation and reporting component of the software was called “CEMView
client”.
[40]      Nexus
has developed and markets various levels of CEMView products.  Its entry level
product is “CEMView Data Logger” which is used to acquire and record emissions
data.  It then does calculations without acquiring and analyzing the emissions
data in accordance with regulatory standards that apply to the client.
[41]      A
higher-level product, the “CEMView Standard Edition” acquires and records
emission data in accordance with regulatory standards.  The highest-level
product is “CEMView Premium Edition”, and it had more bells and whistles. 
While CEMView Data Logger cost in the range of $2,000, CEMView SE was in the
range of $12,000 to $15,000.
[42]      As
noted, CEMView is OPC compliant.  CEMView software was developed in accordance
with OPC Foundation specifications.  Thus, CEMView translates the data it
acquires from the process analyzers into a form that can be understood by other
OPC compliant machines.  This was considered by Nexus to be an important selling
point of CEMView.
[43]      “OPC
Classic” was the first OPC specification released in the late 1990’s.  CEMView
was developed with reference to OPC Classic specifications using source code
language called C++.  Despite Joseph attempting to magnify OPC UA as being an
important aspect of CEMView, on cross-examination, he agreed that even as of
the date of trial, Nexus has not yet integrated OPC UA into its CEMView
products.
[44]      Each
employee at Nexus had their own computer.  Those computers were identified by
the user, for example “Joe’s PC” or “Vlad’s PC”.  Each employee had an email
address using the Nexus domain.  Nexus has access to all of its employees’
emails.  Thus, Joseph produced a number of emails within Nexus’ possession,
taken from its employees’ computers, including those sent by the employee and
received by the employee.  The defendants admitted the authenticity of the
emails in respect of Vlad.
[45]      Nexus required
their employees to complete and submit timesheets.  Each timesheet shows the
pay period, and the amounts of hours devoted to specific tasks on each day of
the week.  For example, there were specific tasks such as “CEMView
Development”.  This would represent the amount of time that an employee spent doing
software development for CEMView products.  Specific projects are identified on
the timesheets, identified by the name of the client’s site.  The employees
prepared and submitted the timesheets.  The timesheets evolved so that they
also tracked when the employees arrived at work and departed.  They also
included breaks.
[46]      Joseph
testified that he became concerned generally with the employees’ hours.  Up
until early 2010, he had not carefully monitored the employees’ hours. 
However, he instructed Alexandre in February of 2010 to email all staff about
keeping accurate timesheets.  There are a number of emails to employees in
which Joseph is critical of the employees for abusing the work hours policy and
he impliedly threatens termination.
[47]      I find
that Joseph was a demanding employer.  This was evidenced by  several emails
that he authored that were condescending in their tone.  By way of example, Joseph’s
email dated April 22, 2010, in which he is clearly frustrated with one of his
developers, but cc’s the entire staff in which he defines the word “patient”
(Ex. “179”)  Victor’s emails often had the same tone.
[48]      Joseph
also insisted that if an employee was going to take any time off, including a
few hours, that they notify their supervisor in advance and arrange to make up
the time.  In fact, Vlad was docked pay for an absence because he had not
gotten it pre-approved.
[49]      Importantly,
I accept that the employees at Nexus did not have a lot of independence in the
manner in which they performed their work.  Jospeh kept tight control over the
developers in many respects.  In the same email chain dated April 21, 2010,
(Ex. “179”), Joseph writes as follows:
[50]      Joseph
also offered his advice to developers when they were trouble shooting with
clients’ projects and many emails were tendered in which he did so.  His tone on
most of those occasions was professional and criticism would be constructive.  Although
some of the emails were often blunt and to the point, many were respectful.  It
is likely that Ex. “179” is somewhat of an outlier of Joseph’s tone, likely born
out of frustration given that the client had threatened to remove Nexus from
its site as a result of the employee’s error but there are other examples of him
taking that tone.
[51]      Nexus
sent, and offered to send, its employees to conferences and seminars to further
their training and education.  Nexus offered to pay for employees’ tuition
expenses.  Joseph would frequently share links with the developers, including
Vlad, when OPC provided updates, including on OPC UA.
[52]      I note
that Nexus had a written Employee Manual, authored by Joseph.  The manual set
out expectations with respect to work schedules, breaks, attendance and
vacations.  It described Nexus’ expectations with respect to staff training and
development.  Nexus would pay tuition expenses and for employees to attend
approved conferences and seminars.  The Employee Manual also sets out the
system for disciplinary action, stated to be progressive, including leading up
to termination.  The Manual specifically describes that client information obtained
from the client or by way of performing daily job functions is company
confidential to Nexus.  It is also described that full-time employees are
salaried, and overtime is not paid.  If an employee is required to work extra
time due to project demands, then with manager’s approval, the employee would
be entitled to paid time-off in lieu.
[53]      There
was no non-compete clause in the Manual or in any agreement between Nexus and
Vlad.  In fact, other than the Employee Manual, there was no written contract
between Nexus and Vlad.
[54]      Vlad
was born in Minsk, Belarus.  He testified that he studied at Belarus State
University from approximately 1992 to 1999.  His brother, Alexandre, came to
Canada first.  The rest of the family, including Vlad followed later, in 1998. 
Vlad first lived and worked in Toronto and then he moved to London and joined
Nexus.  He and Alexandre were still working in the IT department of a bank when
they met Joseph.  They did some work for him on another project.  This led to
them helping with continuous emissions monitoring at Nexus.  He first started
there in 1999.
[55]      Vlad
agreed that Joseph was the architect of CEMView.  Alexandre was a senior
software developer.  The software developers wrote the source code for CEM
View.  Up until approximately 2003, only Vlad and Alexandre were doing software
development at Nexus.  Joseph was not involved directly with very much
development.  Vlad thought that he and his brother were doing about 95% of the
development.  At that time, they were paid through Elite Technologies and were
contractors of Nexus.
[56]      In
2004, Vlad had a disagreement with his brother and formed his own company, ACT
Group with his wife, Daria.  Vlad and Daria are each 50% shareholders of ACT
Group.  She did the accounting and Vlad was a contractor for Nexus.  They had
an employee from 2004 to 2006, Paul Glibin, who also did some work for Nexus
through ACT Group.  In 2005, Daria was offered a job at the CRA and, according
to Vlad, stopped doing the ACT Group accounting work.
[57]      Joseph
testified about Vlad’s duties while he was with Nexus.  He was one of two
primary software developers, Alexandre being the other.  Vlad was also sent to
sites to help customers with start ups.  He was never involved with sales or
providing quotes.  According to Joseph, Vlad and Alexandre had a role in the
hiring process.  New programmers would be working with and under Vlad.  Emails
to and from Vlad were tendered into evidence confirming that Vlad was part of
the hiring process.
[58]      Many
emails were tendered into evidence showing how Vlad would receive his work
assignments.  Vlad would receive direct communications from other Nexus
employees that would request assistance with specific CEMS related issues.  For
example, in Ex. “233”, an email dated July 1, 2008, Vlad was asked to
troubleshoot a previously integrated system.  In Ex. “234”, tasks were
distributed by one developer to a number of the other developers, including
Vlad, with Joseph weighing in to offer advice on how to approach the tasks. Often,
there would be a chain of command, starting with Victor or Joseph and working
its way down to Vlad.  Vlad would report back to them with his progress or
suggestions.
[59]      The
emails demonstrate that Vlad was not tasked with writing source code on a daily
basis.  He also had to troubleshoot for clients, often on an urgent basis. 
Many of these emails were from 2009 when Vlad’s hours and check-ins were
allegedly down.  Vlad testified that the tasks he was assigned would take from
a couple of hours to a couple of days to a couple of weeks depending on their
nature.  Quite often, he would have several competing tasks which he had to
prioritize depending upon the urgency level.  Some of the tasks would require
working with other employees.  Some would involve direct interactions between
Vlad and the customer, including attending at their site to complete the work.  In
fact, Nexus paid for Vlad to travel to Saudi Arabia for a project in October of
2010.
[60]      Vlad
described that OPC servers was a main area that he would work on.  Setting up
an entirely new OPC server could take days and sometimes weeks.
[61]      A
review of Vlad’s timesheets (Ex.”18”) leads to the conclusion that Vlad spent significant
time developing CEMView programming.  “CEMView Development” on the timesheet
relates to how much time Vlad spent doing software development.  I find that the
majority of Vlad’s time was spent on software development and/or OPC Server
Development.  There would be periods in which his time would be more heavily
devoted to specific projects.
[62]      I find
as a fact that although a significant component of Vlad’s job was to write
source code, he had responsibilities outside of source code development.  A
significant responsibility was troubleshooting for clients.
[63]      Vlad
has presented a shifting narrative of his role as an employee at Nexus.  In an
affidavit sworn August 18, 2011, Vlad characterized his employment as a
computer programmer as “data entry”, indicating that he “took instructions from
his superiors on what to do, when to do it and when to do it by”.  However, he
also described himself to the Professional Engineers of Ontario as working in
engineering during that period of time.  He also wrote a reference for a
departing Nexus employee in which he described himself as a “manager” at Nexus,
although he conceded that was not accurate.  Furthermore, he wrote in an email
to SICK on January 25, 2011, that he was intimately involved with CEMS software
development at Nexus.  I find that Vlad was far more than a “data entry clerk”.
[64]      Joseph
testified that Vlad was familiar with OPC UA functionality, which is one of the
extensions of OPC.  Vlad was on a list of authorized persons that could access
the corporate membership information on behalf of Nexus.  He had his own
password.  Thus, Vlad was able to access OPC UA code that was released to
corporate members.  This is confirmed by various emails, including one from
Vlad to Joseph dated October 19, 2006 (Ex.”28”).  He also attended OPC UA
conferences.
[65]      Joseph
testified that C# language for coding was a cornerstone of Nexus’ business,
although CEMView was coded using C++.  Thus, according to Joseph, Vlad knew how
to code using C# and had taken courses in C#.  Vlad was the first person
certified in C# at Nexus.  An email dated November 17, 2008 (Ex.”40”) confirms
that Vlad was sent Microsoft Visual C# 2008 Step by Step book.pdf.  Vlad
ordered a Microsoft C# technology exam in February of 2009.  Nexus reimbursed
him for the costs of this exam.  Vlad ultimately passed the certification exam
in December of 2009.  He accordingly obtained a Microsoft Certificate of
Excellence to be recognized as a Microsoft Certified Professional Developer
(Ex. “54”).  Nexus paid for this certification.
[66]      However,
on cross-examination, Joseph admitted that throughout all of the Nexus commits
and check-ins, he only found two entries where Vlad used C#.
[67]      Vlad
acknowledged that Joseph would send emails containing links to OPC UA, as well
as offer to send the developers to OPC UA seminars.  Joseph would follow the
development of OPC UA and periodically discuss it with the developers.  Vlad
went to a C++ seminar that was useful for OPC servers and CEMView, in 2008 in
Phoenix, Arizona but did not attend C# seminars.  Another Nexus developer went
to the C# seminar.  He denied opening a link sent to him by Joseph about OPC UA
sent to him on March 28, 2008.  OPC UA was not yet being used in their
products.
[68]      In
March of 2010, Joseph asked the developers if they wanted to participate in an
OPC UA introduction webinar.  Vlad responded that it was too expensive.  It was
his assessment that OPC UA was not yet ready to be used in 2008.  By 2010,
Vlad’s assessment was that the product was now ready to be looked at more
seriously.  He thought that this was better than C# because Nexus used C++
source code.  Nexus never purchased the OPC UA or C# toolkit.
[69]      Vlad
denied every being tasked with integrating OPC UA into CEMView by Nexus.  Joseph
would be the only one that would make those decisions.
[70]      Nexus
was attempting to market CEMView in Saudi Arabia.  In the mid-2000s, Nexus was
introduced to a Saudi Arabian integrator named Arabian Technical Trading Est
(“Attest”).  An integrator is a contractor that assembles packages for
industrial plants that include the process analyzers that measure smokestack
emissions, as well as the necessary software to process the data from the
analyzers.  Attest had the Saudi Arabian distributorship for process analyzers
built by SICK.
[71]      Nexus
began receiving purchase orders for CEMView from Attest in 2006.  The first
contract was for the sum of $69,603.00 USD.  It was in relation to a Methanol
Complex in Al-Jubail, Saudi Arabia.
[72]      Another
contractor in the region was Lantern Software & Systems (“Lantern”), whose
principal was an individual named Jabir Hameed (“Jabir”).  Nexus would seek
CEMS work in Saudi Arabia through Jabir at Lantern.
[73]      On
January 28, 2008, Nexus quoted Lantern for a further system for a different
power plant, in the amount of $7,650.00 USD.  Nexus’ bid was not accepted.
[74]      However,
in February of 2008, Jabir advised Nexus of further CEMS projects in Saudi
Arabia.  These all related to installations operated by the Saudi Electric Company
(“SEC”) which is responsible for electricity generation in the region.  Nexus
accordingly made six quotes from January 21, 2009, to February 8, 2010, to
Lantern.  These quotes ranged from $14,880.00 USD to $219,580.00 USD.
[75]      Two of
the most noteworthy quotes in the context of this case are in relation to Madina
(sometimes spelled “Medinah” in the documentation) and a project in Ar-Razi
(sometimes spelled “ARRAZI”).  Nexus did not get these projects.  Ar-Razi was a
CEMS project that Nexus bid for starting in March of 2006.  It involved CEMS
for each of three plants labelled “II”, “III” & “IV”.  Vlad was involved in
the Ar-Razi project and met Jabir when Nexus was bidding for it in 2006
(Ex.”60”) .
[76]      In the
fall of 2010, Nexus quoted prices to different integrators for two separate
series of projects for the SEC.  In September of 2010, Nexus quoted its CEMView
software to Horiba Instruments for $1,608,840 USD.  In November of 2010, Nexus
quoted Mannai for a series of projects for $1,480,100 USD.
[77]      From
all of those quotes, Nexus received only one purchase order from Lantern on
June 30, 2009, for a project located in Rabigh, Saudi Arabia, for $134,370.00
CAD.  Otherwise, Nexus was unsuccessful with respect to their bids for these
SEC projects.
[78]      It is
not currently before me to determine whether or not Nexus failed to obtain
those projects as a result of any of the defendants.  I note that there were
emails tendered into evidence that indicate that Nexus was not in favour with
some of the Saudi companies involved.  Thus, it is for another day, perhaps,
whether anything the Defendants have done actually cost Nexus projects.
[79]      Vlad
and Joseph did not always see eye to eye.
[80]      Vlad
testified that he continued, to Joseph’s knowledge, to do work through ACT
Group on the side from 2005 onward.  According to Vlad, these jobs never
involved CEMS development.  Vlad testified that this work was always done on Vlad’s
personal time and never on Nexus’ time.  He specifically disclosed this work to
Joseph and Nexus, and it was his belief and understanding that ACT Group was
free to perform such outside work.  I do not believe that this proposition was
put to Joseph during his cross-examination.
[81]      In
2008, Vlad had declined to become a shareholder.  He testified that he was
dissatisfied with working at Nexus.  The business was primarily run by the
Sue-Tang family.  His brother, Alexandre, was above him.  They all had nice
offices and Vlad still had a cubicle for his desk.  He testified that he did
not see any path to progressing in the company.  I note that on
cross-examination, Vlad agreed that despite his evidence-in-chief, only Joseph
had a nice office and everyone else had cubicles like him.
[82]      Vlad
testified that he took some steps to improve himself.  He was limited by only
having done C++ work at Nexus.  He applied for the Professional Engineering of
Ontario (“PEO”) to improve his certifications and obtain his Project Management
Professional designation.  He started sending out his resume and applying for
other positions without success.
[83]      Vlad
also attempted to do some work as a contractor through ACT Group.  In 2008, he
approached Jabir, who he had met through Nexus’ work with Lantern in 2003. 
According to Vlad, he was only looking for opportunities that were for non-CEMS
projects.  He was hoping to find work on automation projects, but not CEMS.  In
April of 2008, Jabir sent Vlad an email (Ex. “80”) about a new project
involving the Hadeed Project.  That email, dated April 14, 2008, describes that
the new project involved:
[84]      Vlad
described that this involved a “DISOMAT application”.  It did require the
configuration of software.  It does not appear to be CEMS.  I note that Vlad
responded to Jabir on April 18, 2008, stating:
[85]      I note
that these emails all took place prior to Vlad selling his shares in June of
2008.  He admitted during his testimony that Joseph would have been unaware of
this proposed work.
[86]      Vlad
tendered an 18-page Commercial Proposal through ACT Group on May 2, 2008 (Ex.
“82”) but did not obtain this work.  Of note, the DISOMAT application included
a device communication layer, a database records maintenance and a presentation
layer.  These are traits found in many industrial programs, including CEMS.
[87]      Vlad
and Serge testified that ACT Group had a computer “lab” at Vlad’s home.  This
consisted of two desks with desktop computers in a spare bedroom and a “test
lab” with two other computers in the basement.  Vlad testified that he wrote
the source code for this project at home.  He kept the DISOMAT source code on
his hard drive for over two years.
[88]      Jabir
presented Vlad with another new project by email dated July 15, 2008 (Ex. “83”). 
This project was for the SEC and was for a web-enabled boiler tube failure
tracking database software package.  Again, this does not appear to be in
relation to CEMS. Vlad did not get the project.
[89]      Vlad
applied to the PEO in July of 2008, after he had sold his shares in Nexus.  The
PEO raised concerns with the validity of Vlad’s academic record.  Plaintiff’s
counsel wanted to make significant use of the file produced by the PEO, but I
thought it had limited value.  First of all, the PEO’s communications were
hearsay and inadmissible for the truth of their contents.  Suffice it to say
that there were some inconsistencies between what Vlad testified to in court,
during his examination-for-discovery and what his academic records from the
University of Belarus and the University of Samara show.  However, those latter
documents, beyond being hearsay, were translated from Russian.  I put little
weight on them.
[90]      I do
not take very much from the PEO file.  However, Vlad does describe to the PEO
in his letter dated November 23, 2014 (Ex. “290”) that at the time that he
interviewed with the panel in December of 2008, he “had more than 10 years of
engineering experience (first working for INEA Corporation in Toronto, and
later at Nexus Solutions Inc. in London, Ontario)…”.  I have already described
that this is inconsistent with his sworn evidence that he was basically doing
data entry.  This is Vlad’s letter and is admissible against him.
[91]      Joseph
wrote an email to the PEO dated August 17, 2010 (Ex. “177”) in which Joseph
expressed concerns to the PEO about Vlad’s qualifications to be licensed as an
engineer.  Joseph described that at no time did he consider Vlad’s work to be
professional engineering and he was not authorized to deal with Nexus’ clients
as if he was providing professional engineering services.
[92]      The
defence asks me to take from this email that Joseph held animus towards Vlad. 
I decline to do so.  It is my view that Joseph believed it was his duty, which
it was, to provide a candid opinion with respect to his views of Vlad’s credentials
as an engineer.  I note that Vlad still obtained his designation
notwithstanding these concerns.
[93]      I do
not intend to rely on the PEO file for any further purpose as it only serves to
distract from the real issues in this case.
[94]      Joseph
testified that Vlad’s productivity became an ongoing issue starting in 2009,
which prompted the crackdown on employees keeping track of their hours to some
extent.  Joseph testified that he felt he needed to be more aggressive in
curtailing Vlad’s long lunches.  On August 12, 2010, Vlad was docked pay for
taking a half day off without making prior arrangements with his supervisor.  Joseph
testified that when Vlad was confronted about it, he apologized.
[95]      In
that regard, Joseph compiled a summary of Vlad’s check-ins at Nexus for each
month from June  2009 to January 2011 (Ex. “73”).  The chart showed the number
of days with check-ins, as well as the specific edits, additions and
deletions.  Joseph used the ID “Vlad” in the Nexus commits to determine the
number of check-ins that Vlad did.  Joseph was trying to show that there was a
substantial reduction in the number of check-ins that Vlad made in 2009 and
2010, suggesting that he must have been devoting a lot more time to ACT
Group/Limesoft projects during that time.
[96]      I
agree that Ex. “73” shows far fewer check-ins during the months of 2009 and
2010 than in previous times.  However, this trend started well before that
time, as early as 2006.  Furthermore, during Vlad’s testimony it was apparent
that Vlad was doing check-ins not only under his own ID name, but under generic
names such as “developer” or “support”.  This was corroborated by
documentation.  If you include the IDs for “developer” and “support”, there are
a further 498 commits from October 31, 2007, to April 5, 2010, although it is
not clear how many of these were by Vlad.  I believe that this chart could
simply demonstrate that Vlad’s job morphed into more client troubleshooting
work, than pure source code developing.  I do not accept that this summary
demonstrates that Vlad was devoting any less time to Nexus projects as he had
in the past.  Rather, the summary provides evidence that is simply
inconclusive.
[97]      Joseph
described a project in 2010 that involved troubleshooting for SICK and
ultimately a factory acceptance test had to be done in September or October of
2010 in Dresden, Germany.  Vlad was asked to install a “switch” so that Nexus
could show SICK why the system was failing them.  Vlad had three weeks to build
the “switch”.  According to Joseph, Vlad did not complete the task and the SICK
representatives were unimpressed with Nexus.
[98]      As a
result, Joseph was really upset with Vlad.  When Joseph returned to Canada he
decided to ask Vlad for his resignation.  He had seen a decline in Vlad’s
performance since he had sold his shares in Nexus.  Alexandre opposed asking
Vlad to resign.  However, a day or two later, Vlad sent in a formal letter of
resignation.  I note that Vlad’s letter of resignation is in all respects
professional.
[99]      Vlad
signed a document agreeing to turn over all Nexus property on his departure.
[100]    Joseph
testified that he first learned of Limesoft in 2009, but, according to him, not
much came of it.  He testified that he was working on a proposal for SICK in
2009 involving OPC UA.  He had attended conferences with SICK employees and
there was some back and forth between them.  While conducting an internet
search, Joseph came across a website for Limesoft which claimed that they were
using OPC UA technology.  Joseph was surprised that he had not heard of
Limesoft because it is a very small market.  Limesoft’s website indicated that
they were located in Ottawa, and he was unfamiliar with any competitors in that
area.  Screenshots from the Limesoft webpage, captured in 2009, were made Ex
“69”.
[101]    According
to the website, Limedas was used “to collect, store, display and report
emission monitoring data from a variety of sources. Limedas was described as
designed to monitor emissions such as SO2, NOx, CO, CO2, VOC and generate
regulatory compliance data reports.”  It was also described as being based on
OPC UA technology.
[102]    It
appeared to Joseph that Limedas was in direct competition with Nexus’ CEMView. 
In fact, Limesoft appeared to be actually ahead of Nexus in some of its OPC UA
development.  According to Joseph, he called all of the developers at Nexus into
a meeting in Victor’s office to determine if any of them were familiar with
Limesoft.  This included Vlad and Alexandre.  No one at Nexus indicated that
they were aware of Limesoft.
[103]    Joseph
states that in 2010, when he was concerned with Vlad’s hours and productivity,
he spoke to him about trying to progress in Nexus’ development of OPC UA
software.  He was in Vlad’s office and asked to see what Vlad had come up
with.  Vlad turned his computer monitor to show Joseph and the computer was
running a Limedas demo.  Joseph thought that was a good thing and instructed
Vlad to work through the demo.  At that time, Joseph was not concerned that
Vlad had the demo.
[104]    Vlad
denied that there was any meeting involving him and the other Nexus developers
about Limesoft.  He denied that he ever had the Limesoft demo running on his
computer when Joseph came in and denied ever running Limedas on any Nexus
computer.
[105]    For
reasons that will be expanded upon later, I accept Joseph’s evidence over
Vlad’s generally.  I also accept that Joseph would inquire of his developers as
soon as he learned of a rival product.  However, I do find it noteworthy,
considering Joseph’s history of emailing his developers, that no email was
tendered into evidence where Joseph inquires of any Nexus employees about
Limedas.
[106]    In any
event, Joseph did not hear anything further about Limedas until after Vlad’s
departure from Nexus.
[107]    After
Vlad had left Nexus, on February 3, 2011, Victor forwarded an email to Joseph
that had been sent from a senior product manager at SICK.  That email (Ex. “76”)
indicated that SICK had received an email from Vlad and asked if he was related
to Alex and Nexus in any way.
[108]    Enclosed
with that email was an email from vkrougly@limesoft.ca, dated
January 25, 2011.  The subject line of the email was “New alternative to
CEMView”.  Vlad writes as follows:
[109]    Attached
to Vlad’s email was a Limesoft Inc. pamphlet (Ex.”77”), 20 pages in length.  It
is a very well put together document and presumably took a fair amount of
effort.  I note the following taken from the pamphlet:
[110]    Both
Vlad and Serge testified that despite what Vlad’s email to SICK claimed, and
what the pamphlet states, Limedas was not capable of doing CEMS at that time.  Vlad
described that the attached Limesoft brochure’s purpose was to get SICK
interested in Limesoft.  However, SICK was not an end user.  While Vlad described
Limedas as a CEM system, he knew it would not have to be installed right away. 
He believed it would take a year or two before this would generate any
interest.  Thus, he denies that the project was up and running.  It was not
possible to do CEMS right away.   He says of the Basic, Standard and Enterprise
editions, only Basic was available at that time.  This was the basic Data Logger. 
To be used for CEMS, one would need either Standard or Enterprise edition. 
Essentially, the brochure was exaggerating Limesoft’s capabilities at that
time.  He described that CEMS work did not become a focus of Limesoft until
after he left Nexus, and thus by that time, Limesoft’s CEMS capability was only
about 10% along.
[111]    Similarly,
Serge testified that Limedas did not have that capability at the time.  He
testified that he prepared the Limesoft pamphlet.  He was testing the market
for pre-sales and described it as “customer discovery”.  The purpose was to
attempt to get some nibbles, even if the product could not yet perform.  Unless
they got a nibble, then they would not spend the money to develop the product. 
If they got a nibble, then they would do the development for the future. 
Limesoft would finalize pricing and timing down the road, which could even be
two years later.
[112]    Frankly,
I do not believe that evidence.
[113]    Upon
learning about Vlad’s connection to Limesoft, Nexus moved quickly to commence
legal proceedings, issuing a statement of claim on March 8, 2011.
[114]    Joseph
went to Limesoft’s website and took screenshots of it (Ex. “78”).  Limesoft’s
address was on the website as being in Ottawa, Ontario.  Joseph performed a
Google map search of the Ottawa address and downloaded a photograph of the so-called
Limesoft headquarters.  It is a modest townhouse (Ex. “79”).
[115]    Serge
testified that the Ottawa address belonged to a friend of his mother.  He
testified that he was embarrassed about where he was living in London at the
time, and wanted an address that if anyone looked it up, it would seem more
impressive.  I completely reject that explanation.  The Ottawa address is not
appreciably “more impressive” than his mother’s residence where Serge lived. 
In fact, they are very comparable.  The Ottawa address would never impress
anyone doing a search of Limesoft, at least no more so than Serge’s mother’s
address.
[116]    Nexus
obtained a court Order dated March 28, 2011, from Bryant J., requiring Limesoft
to file its source code with the court and all information from its source code
control system, if any.
[117]    As
noted, Nexus has access to all of its employees’ emails.  Thus, during the course
of this investigation, Nexus has discovered a number of emails about which they
were previously unaware.  These include the emails referred to between Jabir
and Vlad about DISOMAT and the web-based boiler project.
[118]    There
is an important email dated December 16, 2008, from Vlad to Serge (Ex. “33”). 
The subject line is “Stuff to Read”.  Vlad sends various links so that Serge
can “start with OPC UA”.  Joseph testified that Serge was not an employee of
Nexus and only authorized personnel were permitted to access the OPC Foundation
website, where these  links came from.  Thus, Joseph was of the view that Vlad
was sharing private information with Serge.  Joseph was unaware that this was
occurring.   On cross-examination, Joseph testified that if Vlad was sharing
code or SICK protocols to Serge it would have constituted a fireable offense.
[119]    Vlad
acknowledged forwarding the OPC UA to Serge.  According to Vlad, Serge was
considering using OPC UA in 2009 for his engineering project.  Serge admits that
Vlad sent him various links for OPC UA to get started.  OPC UA was supposed to
be the latest innovation.  Serge thought that using OPC UA would improve OPC
and wanted to learn more about it.  Serge used the links to log in, look at the
material, probably downloaded it, but in 2008 he denied that he did anything
with it.
[120]    There
is an email dated February 9, 2010, from sales@limesoft to Jabir at Lantern
regarding the “Yanbu project” (Ex. “96”).  It is about the Limedas software. 
It references a gas analyzer and an opacity monitor device.  It is signed by
Serge Bays.
[121]    There
is an email dated March 28, 2010 (Ex.”93”) from Sales Department (sales@limesoft.ca) to Jabir at Lantern.  The subject line is ARRAZI. 
It is stated to include a quote.  The attached quote, (Ex “94”) is for the
Limedas web portal for emission data for ARRAZI II, III and IV Plants.  This
quote would appear to be in direct competition with Nexus’ product in the
region.
[122]    This
was followed by emails from sales@limesoft to Jabir enclosing information about
the Limedas Data Logger on May 10, 2010 (Ex. “95”).  This was in respect of the
Medinah project.  Vlad acknowledged during his evidence that he was involved in
preparing the Limedas pamphlet that accompanied these emails.  He described
that it was only a Datalogger, and did not compute averages and thus, in his
view, was not CEMS.  Thus, although it was close to products that Nexus
developed, Nexus had stopped selling dataloggers for three or four years.  He
saw no harm in Serge pursuing this opportunity through Limesoft, but he did not
put a bid on it through ACT Group because it was too similar to Nexus’
products.
[123]    On May
25, 2010, (Ex.”84”), Jabir emailed Vlad at ACT Group regarding a project.  In
Vlad’s response, of the same date, he has copied sbays@actgroup.ca. 
He introduces Serge to the individuals included in the email chain, as ACT
Group’s “software engineer who is directly responsible for the front-end
customer application development”.  I do not believe that this project relates
to emissions.  It is described as an AFIS project.  AFIS is a fingerprint
reading software for used for security purposes.
[124]    On June
13, 2010, emails (Ex. “117”) Jabir advised Vlad that the Medina project had
been awarded.  This is one of the projects that Nexus had tendered a quote in
July of 2009.  Vlad testified that this was about the AFIS fingerprinting.  However,
there is a subsequent email dated December 21, 2010, about the Medina project
from Vlad to Jabir, with Serge cc’d with the subject line “FW: Madina CEMS
Commissioning”.  Despite that label, Serge maintained that it was not a CEMS
project.
[125]    In an
email dated July 9, 2010 (Ex. “86”), Vlad, from his ACT Group email, writes to
Jabir about the AFIS project.  In that email, he states as follows:
[126]    There
is an email from Vlad at his Nexus email to Vlad at a personal account dated
July 29, 2010 (Ex. “88”).  He attaches export declarations that he has obtained
from a co-worker at Nexus.  Vlad then appears to enlist Serge to assist him in
handling the shipping between Canada and Saudi Arabia.  In other words, Vlad
asked a Nexus co-worker for shipping forms so that he could use them for either
ACT Group or Limesoft.
[127]    Recall
that in the fall of 2010, Nexus paid for Vlad to travel to Saudi Arabia to
perform work for Nexus on the Ar-Razi project and the Rabigh project.  While he
was there, Vlad acknowledges that he traveled to Saudi Arabia to do work for
Nexus, but he described that Jabir paid for the flights.  Since he was going to
be there anyways, Vlad testified that he and Serge thought that he should do a
demo of Limedas for Medinah.  He described that the demo would take place
during his free time between Nexus work.
[128]    There
are emails between Serge and Vlad from October 2010 (Ex. “120”) that were sent
while Vlad was in Saudi Arabia.  The emails indicate that Vlad made the first
presentation and “it went well”.  “Tomorrow, I will be setting a Madinah (sic)
project”.  The emails reference Limedas.
[129]    Of
note, Vlad made commits in the Limedas repositories in October of 2010, while
on this trip, in which he “Separated demo and Madinah installers” and “Madinah
installer added”.
[130]    Vlad
admitted that while he was in Saudi Arabia, he spoke to Jabir about his
interest in leaving Nexus.  Jabir wanted him to leave Nexus and form a
partnership with him.  Vlad testified that Serge was also interested in working
with him.
[131]    In that
vein, Daria sent a very important and contentious series of emails dated
October 27, 2010 (Ex. “97”).  In her first email, only sent to Vlad, Daria writes
as follows:
[132]    In a
later email in the same chain and on the same date, Daria writes to both Vlad
and Serge the following:
[133]    Vlad testified
that there was no reality to this email from Daria, that she was not involved with
Limesoft or ACT Group at all by that time, and that the email was not the basis
for any serious discussion.  The court should essentially disregard it as being
a meaningless fantasy.  Serge, who had the benefit of watching Vlad testify,
echoed Vlad’s testimony that there was no basis in reality for this email and
he had no idea what it meant or where Daria got the figures from.  Serge
maintained that Limesoft was his company and that he would have been entitled
to a far bigger share than Vlad.
[134]    Daria,
a party to the litigation, was present in the courtroom throughout the trial. 
Notably, although she could have offered evidence with respect to this key
document, Daria did not testify.  The plaintiff asks that I draw an adverse
inference.  In my view, I need not do so.  I simply do not believe either Vlad
or Serge about their description of this email as being a “fantasy”.  Rather, I
find that it was intended to be the starting point of discussions with Jabir
and that Daria was involved in ACT Group/Limesoft at that time.
[135]    On
November 16, 2010, Serge sent an email to Vlad with the subject line “SEC West”
and enclosing a Limesoft Inc. document entitled “SEC WEST CEMS” (Ex. 124”).  It
notes that it was authored by Serge B.  Its purpose is to describe the
functionality of Limedas software to be supplied as a continuous gas emission
monitoring system for Saudi Electricity West Province power plants.  It relies
upon OPC UA.  This Limesoft pamphlet was sent to Jabir on November 16, 2010.
[136]    There
is an email from SICK to Vlad dated March 11, 2011 (Ex.”138”) in which SICK
expresses concern about Vlad’s prior involvement with Nexus and needing to
check the “legal situation”.  Vlad, in an email dated March 11, 2011 (Ex.
“139”) suggests “keeping their conversation confidential”.  I take this as an
acknowledgment on Vlad’s part that he may have crossed a legal line with Nexus.
[137]    There
is an email dated April 25, 2011, from Hameed to Vlad (Ex. 297”).  This
confirms two projects from SEC to Attest for two power plants in Saudi Arabia. 
It is for CEMView.  Vlad acknowledged that Limesoft got one of these projects
for sure.  Vlad denied that he and Jabir were trying to scoop the CEMS work
from Nexus.  Instead, Vlad testified that he was avoiding that type of work. 
He says that from late 2009, his plan was not to build CEMS software based on
OPC UA software.
[138]    There
are emails dated May 28, 2011, where Jabir congratulates Vlad for being awarded
three CEMs contracts.  The emails go to the ACT Group email.
[139]    Serge
came to Canada from Ukraine in 2000, at the age of 12.  He went to elementary
and high school in London before attending UWO starting in 2006.  He says that
he actually started taking some UWO courses while still in high school through
a gifted student program.  Serge was taking Software Engineering and using
engineering protocols for software development.
[140]    While
at UWO, after completing his first-year studies, Serge was an intern at Nexus. 
By my calculation, this would have been in the summer of 2007.  His time at
Nexus was his first exposure to software engineering.  He started helping here
and there and reviewing technical documents, like manuals.  He was testing OPC
software and servers.  He did not do any software development at all because Nexus
used C++ and he knew C#.  He did do a lot of OPC software testing during his
internship.
[141]    Serge
did not think that it made sense to use OPC Foundation the way Nexus was using
it.  After he left Nexus, he was working on projects in different fields.  This
included automation, plant, aerospace and industrial.  In all of those fields,
there had to be communication between various devices.  OPC could be used for
that purpose.
[142]    In
Serge’s fourth year at UWO, he was required to do a Capstone Project, like a
thesis.  The students had to use engineering principles to demonstrate
knowledge in the field.  The project had to involve design and testing.  He had
to write and design source code.  They had to do “iteration testing” which
meant building a quick prototype, check it, if it does not work, re-do it to
improve it.  He also had to do something that was close to real world ready. 
Serge knew about this project while he was in third year (2008-2009) and
started thinking about what he wanted to do.
[143]    The project
could be individual or done in small groups.  He had a partner, Cody Martin. 
They both did all of the work.  He had a professor as a project coordinator and
a different professor as a faculty advisor.  He needed an industry advisor and
asked Vlad to assume that role.  Therefore, Vlad and ACT Group acted as his
industry advisor.
[144]    By
mid-term, the project had to meet certain milestones.  They had come up with a
project name—"Limedas” and a company name.  They named the company “ACT
Group Inc.” because they were the industry advisors.  Serge testified that UWO
encourages their students to try to commercialize their projects if they can.  Serge’s
initial idea for the project was the environment and reducing carbon emissions
at oil and gas facilities.  Achieving net-zero carbon emission was important to
Serge.
[145]    Serge
indicated that he spoke with Vlad about the project very early on.  Thus, the
first two revisions were done by “vlad” on June 22, 2009.  This code involved
adding a CEMView database converter that could be used to replace CEMView with
Limesoft product.  Vlad testified that he did so to help Serge with his project
although Serge would not need it.  Vlad had offered to get Serge data from an
oil and gas company.  Serge told him to “give me what you have, and I will
decide whether to use it”.
[146]    Vlad
acknowledged that he gave Serge data that he took from the Plants II, III and
IV at the Ar-razi project in Saudi Arabia for his project.  Vlad did not ask
Ar-razi if he could share this information with anyone nor tell them that he
had done so.  He described that he slightly modified the data and that there
was no way anyone could identify Ar-Razi as the source of the information.  Vlad
had access to Nexus’ backup for Ar-razi.
[147]    Serge
converted CEMView data for his project.  He decided to use Microsoft because it
would work well with C#.  He was not trying to build from scratch, so used
source code from Microsoft SQL server.  He reduced the number of data points
required.  He thought they could store one data point when the alarm is
started, and store the data point when the alarm ends.  This reduced the amount
of storage required.  This innovation was a far more efficient storage of data.
[148]    In
September of 2009, Serge spoke to his professor who thought his project had too
big a scope.  The only industry Serge was familiar with was CEMS, so he decided
to do his project based on that.
[149]    In
October of 2009, Cody and Serge communicated about the project and Serge sent
him an email with a tutorial for javascript.  They had already prepared their Project
Proposal, done on October 6, 2009, for Limedas.  They had planned to start
writing code in January.  They were both doing design and architecture work. 
They needed to learn how to use a lot of the tools. According to the Project
Proposal, the project was clearly CEMS.  Serge had researched available CEMS
products in the market.  He was familiar with Nexus, Honeywell, SICK and
SIEMENS.  Their plan was to use OPC.
[150]    The
project would use Visual Studio, Ankh SVN and Nunit.  It would use Unfuddle for
project management and a source code repository.  Serge had used Unfuddle for a
prior project in his third year.
[151]    Of
note, Serge started setting up Unfuddle on May 26, 2009, prior to arriving at
an idea for his project with Cody.  Serge testified that he started setting up
Unfuddle and had been invited to “unfuddle a project titled My First Project”. 
The email from Unfuddle already referred to Limedas.
[152]    Serge
testified that he had his own computer at home, but it was not very good.  He
could use the computer lab at UWO to do source code.  He also was allowed to go
to Vlad’s house and use the ACT Group Inc. computers that Vlad had set up.
[153]    Serge
testified that Vlad lived about ten minutes away from Serge’s mother, where
Serge lived.  He would go over to Vlad’s house and check-in code for his
project using the ACT Group computers.  According to Serge, Cody would give him
source code that he had written for the project on a data stick, or email it to
him.  No such emails were adduced into evidence.  Serge would then check-in the
source code at Vlad’s house.
[154]    Serge
testified that Limedas was different than CEMView.  He testified that the
modular nature of Limedas meant that if one component failed, another system
would be protected from the crash.  This reduced failure rates.  He also stated
that it was more efficient because Limedas did not have to store historical
data to generate rolling averages for regulatory compliance, like CEMView did.
[155]    Serge
testified that data acquisition, data processing and data presentation are
common to all software systems and are not unique features of CEMS.  I accept
that evidence.  Limedas was intended to be a web-based viewing of emission
data, unlike CEMView.
[156]    In
December of 2009, Serge incorporated Limesoft.  Serge testified that he wanted
a real company behind the project.  He had been using ACT Group before because
they were his industry advisors.  He also had planned to do commercial work
after the project was completed.  He states that he was in discussions with
developers in Belarus and Ukraine.  Cody was not intending to stay involved.  Serge
wanted a company to hold the copyright.
[157]    Serge
testified that he paid $62 for an online template for a website (Ex. “69”). 
The template could be simply filled in, which he did.  Serge states that all
the photographs that are on the website, were part of the template.  He
authored the “We offer solutions to meet your process monitoring requirements”
with Cody’s assistance.  That was part of trying to make the project
realistic.  He testified that they made stuff up about having more than ten
years of experience.  The Recent events were written by Serge and Cody.  This
was to make Limesoft look like a real company.  Cody wrote the section “Live Measurement
Data Acquisition System”.  Cody did the screenshots of the reports and tables. 
Again, this was meant to look real, but was made up.  Under “System
Architecture”, they wrote about OPC UA technology.  Serge testified that it was
a hot topic and OPC UA was making a log of promises about revolutionizing the
industry.  This would “add weight” to their project, but the integration of OPC
UA in their product was not true.
[158]    I
reiterate that Serge testified that he did not want to use his mother’s address
in London because he was embarrassed by it being in a low-income area.  If
anyone went by that address, the company would not look successful.  On
cross-examination, Serge took the position that the Ottawa house was nicer than
his mother’s house.  If so, it is my opinion that it is not appreciably nicer. 
I do not believe Serge about this.
[159]    According
to Serge, he and Cody wrote about 80% of the source code for the project.  He
acknowledged that some of the code that Vlad had written was used in the
project.  According to Serge, he was not proficient in C code but was good with
C#.  Vlad did not know how to write javascript.  Serge described that although
Vlad was trying to be useful, he was not very good at engineering software
design and did not have any time to do it.  However, Serge acknowledged that
Vlad was involved in writing the code for DataLogger.
[160]    Their
final written project was submitted in March of 2010 (Ex. “310”).  In the
Introduction part of their report, it says “Practically, the design document is
required to coordinate the ACT Group Inc. team under a single vision”.  Serge
testified that this was supposed to say “Limesoft”.  This was because they cut
and paste and didn’t change it by mistake.  According to Serge, Limedas could
not calculate one-minute averages.  They did include a sample report for one-minute
averages but could not actually do the calculation.  The same was true for one-hour
averages.
[161]    Serge
testified that he did his presentation on his project in April of 2010.  He
received the highest mark in the class.  He used a power point presentation. 
The demo did not do any averages.  There were numbers in the report, but they
were all simulated data.  They could not use real numbers because had no access
to real clients.  They put data in, but it was not real “one-minute averages”. 
They did try to use realistic looking data.
[162]    Serge
explained that Limedas was designed with four layers.  Their design differed
from Nexus’ CEMView. CEMView used OPC at every layer.  Limedas only used OPC at
the collection, server and client layer.  The OPC was all later removed.   Thus,
there was no connection between the data collection layer and the server. 
There was local storage.  He found OPC difficult to work with.  With the data
in the database, the data could be restored and synced over so that there was
no loss of data.
[163]    Limedas
does not store any historical averages.  His product does not store raw data
for one minute, 15 minute or one-hour averages.  Limedas can recursively
calculate these averages.  If there is a failure, one could just sync over raw
data and not worry about the old data. Therefore, one would not have to worry
about the averages.  Serge described this as the distinguishing feature of Limedas.
[164]    Serge
testified that when his project was complete after March of 2010, he started
trying to monetize it, and therefore, he acknowledged trying to obtain projects
through sales@limesoft.ca.
[165]    The Plaintiff disputes that Serge is the real
controlling mind of Limesoft.  Rather, it asserts that Vlad is the controlling
mind, through ACT Group.
[166]    In a very important piece of testimony, Serge
maintained that he was the controlling mind of Limesoft, not Vlad.  However, he
was asked in cross-examination what percentage of Limesoft’s quotes related to
Basic edition and what part was for Standard edition and Serge indicated it was
about 50-50.  Frankly, this evidence was not even close to being accurate.  The
evidence shows that the vast majority of the quotes were in relation to Standard
edition, about $2.8 million, while only approximately $34,000 was in relation
to Basic edition.  This undermines Serge’s evidence about being in charge of
Limesoft.
[167]    Serge
and Vlad entered into a Share Purchase Agreement on February 1, 2012, for the
shares of Limesoft.  Serge sold 70/100 shares to Vlad for $28,000.  By that
time, they were involved in the lawsuit and Serge needed money to finance the
lawsuit.  Vlad was funding the lawsuit and needed 70% of the shares as
reimbursement.  Subsequently, Serge sold the balance of his shares, 30%, to
Vlad on August 26, 2013, for a further $24,000.  The litigation had taken a
toll on Serge’s mental health, and he testified that he wanted out.  He took a
mental health break.  He then started a consulting company with his friend. 
About a year later he bought 30% of the shares back because he was still
involved in litigation.
[168]    Limesoft’s
Tax Return ending 2011 shows $93,062 owing to corporate shareholders.  Serge
says that this money was advanced by Vlad to help the lawsuit and he did not
want to do it for free.  Serge denied that Vlad was a shareholder prior to
2012.  He does not know why it states, “due to corporate shareholder(s)” on the
Tax Return.  He denies that ACT Group was ever a shareholder in Limesoft. 
Serge was the only shareholder at the time.
[169]    Finally,
the Plaintiff relies upon an email sent from Vlad to SICK dated February 24, 2011,
that describes Serge as assisting Vlad with his presentation.  Serge offered
that Vlad said this to maintain appearances with SICK.  Serge was able to point
to other emails in which Serge has a title with more responsibility than Vlad. 
He says that they would use whatever titles suited their purpose.
[170]    I have
already described how the Unfuddle repositories show their check-ins.
[171]    From
June 2009 to May 2011, Serge testified that he had control of Unfuddle, not ACT
Group and not Limesoft.  It cost about $9 per month for Unfuddle.  Serge
testified that he did  not have a credit card, so he asked to use Vlad’s to pay
for Unfuddle.  However, there is evidence that Serge did have a credit card at
the time.
[172]    ACT
Group’s financial ledger shows that ACT Group was making payments for
Unfuddle.  Both Serge and Vlad testified, very unconvincingly, that Serge
repaid Vlad for making the credit card payments and it is shown rounded up in
payments to Serge on the ACT ledger.  I found this evidence unconvincing.
[173]    Furthermore,
ACT Group is shown on the Unfuddle website as the company associated with
Unfuddle.  Serge indicates that he put that in simply to fill the field on the
questionnaire on the website and that ACT Group was not involved in Unfuddle.
[174]    Ex. “108”
shows check-ins to the Unfuddle Limesoft repositories by the following
usernames: “vlad”, “Vlad”, “serge”, “Serge”, “mihail” and “max”.
[175]    Serge
testified that Vlad brought Max and Mihail into the project to help write
code.  However, Serge could not speak Russian, so Vlad did all of the
communication between them. Vlad testified that Serge asked him to help with
implementation, and Vlad told him he did not have time because of his young
family.  He suggested he use Vlad’s contacts, Max and Mihail, from Eastern
Europe.  Vlad told Serge that they could help with the Datalogger.  There are
commits under their names.  Mihail was working from Ukraine and Max was working
from Belarus.
[176]    Vlad
was cross-examined on December 13, 2011.  At that time, Vlad testified that the
best way to determine who did a commit was to look at the username associated
with the commit.  At trial, he testified that this was not true, and he was
merely guessing when he said that in December of 2011.
[177]    Vlad
testified that when the Unfuddle account was set up with a username, the
username is “cached” so that it would automatically load with that username
when used in the future.  The first time that he and Serge entered source code
into Unfuddle was on June 9, 2009, and they were sitting together.  When they
set up the account, he put in the username “vlad”.  From that time forward, if
a third party used Vlad’s computer to make a commit, it would show “vlad” as
the author, no matter who entered the commit.  When the username “Vlad”
appears, it was from a different computer than the computer that used “vlad”.  Vlad
testified that after the first commit, there is no longer a box where someone
has to add their credentials to show who did the commit.  The program just does
it automatically.
[178]    Serge
testified in a similar fashion.  However, he also had been previously examined
under oath on this issue on September 12, 2011, and he stated at that time that
as far as he could recall, he would use his own name and Vlad would use his own
name and Cody would use “Cody”.
[179]    A
read-in from Serge’s examination for discovery indicates his agreement that the
Limesoft tickets show from January 24, 2010, to January 24, 2011, the majority
of the time the tasks were assigned to Vlad.  Serge agreed that Vlad was
substantially involved with the development of the datalogger functionality. 
This included data acquisition functionality, which was necessary for continuous
emissions monitoring.  Serge indicated however, that when Vlad was submitting
the check-in, Serge was often sitting right there with him, or would sometime
use “vlad’s” username to do the check-ins.
[180]    Vlad
denied doing any of the LCU commits shown on Ex. “108”, despite them appearing
under the usernames “vlad” and “Vlad”.  He testified that Serge did this work. 
Vlad denied doing very many of the commits in the “tools” repository.  Again,
Serge would have done these.  Anytime there was a “Vlad” commit, Vlad indicated
that it was actually Serge.
[181]    This in
my view, makes little sense.  The entire purpose of tracking commits is to
identify and explain modification to the source code.  Accurately showing who
created the source code allows all of the software developers to know who to
consult in the event that they require some explanation about the source code. 
If the username is essentially random so that there is no way to identify the
author of the source code, the purpose for the system is entirely eliminated.
[182]    Furthermore,
Serge was doing a school project.  If he was the author of the code, and he
submitted it under “Vlad” or “vlad”, he may not be given credit for the work by
his professor should that come to light.  It strikes me as an unnecessary risk
to take.
[183]    Ex. “108”
shows “vlad” as working on Limedas as early as June 22, 2009.  Vlad and Serge
acknowledge that it would have been Vlad that did this work, since Serge did
not have the knowledge to add an application “to convert CEMView database to
the new format”.  Again, that would permit CEMView to be converted to a new
system.  June 22, 2009, was a Monday, but this commit was made at 19:26, after
work hours.
[184]    Commits
were made by “vlad” on Tuesday, June 30, 2009, at 6:35 am in the LCU
repository.  Serge testified on cross-examination that he might have done that
commit, but he could not remember.  I would think one would have a distinct
recollection of a pre-dawn trip to Vlad’s house to commit code.  LCU commits
were made on Sunday December 27, 2009, before 8:00 am and “vlad” made early
morning commits on January 29, 2010, as well.  Those certainly would suggest
Vlad doing the work prior to going to work, rather than Serge traveling to
Vlad’s house first thing.  There were also a lot of commits done after 11:00 pm
attributed to “vlad”.  I find it unlikely, although possible, that Serge was at
Vlad’s house at that time of night.  However, Vlad had denied doing any work on
the LCU repository.
[185]    Most of
the commits occurred after normal work hours or on weekends and holidays.  Often,
there are entries during the day on the weekends, but after hours on weekdays. 
If Serge was doing the commits on Vlad’s machines, it would be unnecessary to
avoid Nexus’ business hours.  Thus, if Serge was doing the commits and not
Vlad, one might expect to see less commits that seemed to accommodate Nexus
work hours.
[186]    However,
there are also entries that would have occurred during Nexus’ business hours. 
There are check-ins by “vlad” on Friday, October 30, 2009, at 14:44:13 (Ex.
“102”).  “Vlad” made commits at 14:36:39, 16:16:52 :44 and 16:18:21 on Tuesday,
November 3, 2009.
[187]    Vlad
acknowledged that he probably did the “DL” Repository commits, including the
OPC Foundation commits shown as commits 36 DL, 37 DL and 38 DL.  However, the
source code was what he had developed on his own for the DISOMAT project.
[188]    The
first check-ins that use either “serge” or “Serge” as a username occur after
March 1, 2010, coinciding approximately with the end of his school project.
[189]    The
Limedas Tickets are in evidence.  Generally, most of the tickets refer to
Serge, but certainly many indicate that Vlad was assigned tasks.  Cody was also
assigned tasks, as well as individuals such as Maksim.  I note that Skype
records show that Maksim is a friend of Vlad’s that lives in Minks, Belarus. 
On January 15, 2010, he was sent a link by Vlad via Skype to access OPC
Foundation material.  Maksim was asked by Vlad to send an invoice in the amount
of $1,000 for his work.
[190]    The first
ticket, May 28, 2009, to June 22, 2009, coincides with when Vlad admits that he
was involved in installing the CEMView database converter.
[191]    The
next ticket dated October 12, 2009, was in respect of the OPC UA server and was
to provide a model for 3 sample emission sources, corresponding to “Plant II,
III and IV”.  This was assigned to “Vlad Krougly”.  There are a total of four
tickets opened for “Vlad Krougly” with the same date, involving OPC UA.  I note
that this was the Thanksgiving weekend.  There are also seven separate tickets
for Serge that weekend.
[192]    On
November 3, 2009, Vlad was assigned a ticket in respect of adding data quality,
which appears to relate to calibration.  He was further involved on January 1,
2010.  Ticket ID:44 was assigned to Vlad Krougly on January 7, 2010, was to
integrate a new version of the OPC Foundation SDK, with an estimated time of 8
hours.  Vlad “accepted” this ticket on January 10, and the ticket was closed that
day.  January 7th was a Thursday, and the 10th a Sunday.
[193]    Ticket
ID: 66 was assigned to and accepted by Vlad on April 4, 2010, and indicates
that the client application was to be written in C#.  There was a total time of
20 hours noted.  April 1, 2010, was a Thursday.
[194]    Ticket
ID:87, assigned to Vlad on May 18, 2010, refers to updating OPC UA SDK.  It
notes that “the new version was released on May 5, 2010.  Need to update Core,
Client, Server and Configuration libraries”.  The ticket was accepted by Vlad.
[195]    On July
2, 2010, Vlad was assigned to update OPC Foundation Code.
[196]    Ticket
ID: 166 dated October 24, 2010, assigned after midnight and worked on until
1:26 am, describes that Limedas Release version 1.1 was not working.  This was
assigned to Vlad.  October 24, 2010, was a Sunday.
[197]    Ticket
ID:222 dated February 24, 2011, refers to Serge adding custom regulatory
reports such as daily 15-minute average with 1-hour reports, daily 1-hour
average multi-component report, monthly 1-hour average report, monthly 1-day
average multi-component report and quarterly 1-hour average reports.
[198]    There
are a separate set of Datalogger tickets.
[199]    On
January 25, 2010, Vlad was assigned, and accepted, Ticket ID:45, which was to
integrate OPC Foundation ANSI C-Stack.  This work was done on a Sunday.
[200]    On June
25, 2010, Vlad was assigned to Update OPC UA SDK.  This was resolved August 19,
2010.
[201]    On
September 6, 2010, Ticket ID:120, assigns to Vlad “Implement SICK Maihak CoLa-B
protocol”.  It is noted “Not sure how we can benefit from this, but it’s a good
opportunity to do it now, since the hardware is available for test”.  Joseph
testified that SICK shipped hardware to Nexus for testing at this time and they
had the hardware on site for two weeks.  According to Joseph, Vlad was the only
developer Nexus assigned to the project.  Thus, it certainly appears that Vlad
took this opportunity to test this hardware for the benefit of Limesoft.
[202]    ACT
Group’s accounting records have been produced.  ACT Group’s ledger (Ex. “112”)
shows payments to Maksim on November 12, 2009, in the amount of $540 and again
on September 1, 2010, for $1,050.  There are also regular payments to Serge in
the amount of $3,000.  Substantial funds are deposited from Lantern.  Listed
under “Wages and Salaries” are payments made to Vadim Natsueski.  Recall that
“Vadim” was one of the people described in Daria’s October 2010 email as
receiving 20% of the Limesoft shares.  There is an expense for “Unfuddle
invoices” on September 2, 2020.
[203]    A
screen shot of ACT Group’s Website September 4, 2011, at 10:58 (Ex “115”) describes
that “ACT Group Inc. has developed several applications for the automation
industry.  Recently we were involved in the development of a process monitoring
software package to continuously acquire real-time process and emission data
from a plant smokestack”.
[204]    Recall
the Limesoft pamphlet sent to Jabir about Limedas.  At 6.4 of the pamphlet is a
depiction of circular gauges that display real-time data for emissions.  The
identical depiction is on the ACT Group webpage.  Similarly, there is a
Horizontal Linear Gauges depiction that is identical within the Limesoft
pamphlet and the ACT Group Webpage.
[205]    From
the Read-ins from Daria’s examination for discovery, she indicated that by the
end of 2009, ACT Group was in debt to its shareholders for about $98,000.00. 
Its only shareholders were herself and Vlad.  By the end of October 2010, ACT
Group owed over $200,000 to its shareholders.
[206]    As
noted, Nexus commenced formal legal proceedings on March 8, 2011.
[207]    Limesoft
made 80 quotes of Limedas products between April 17, 2011, and February 2,
2015.  Most of these are for CEMs.  They do not all reference OPC UA.
[208]    For
example, their quote dated April 17, 2011 (Ex. “279”) was for a continuous
emission monitoring system.  Vlad testified that the Limedas project was not
capable at that time of meeting the CEMS requirements but that this was just a
quote, not a purchase order.  Vlad stated that it was three to four months or
up to six months to a year away from being available at that time.  Therefore,
they had lots of time to develop the software had they been awarded this
project.  This does reference OPC UA and OPC Foundations.  He says that they
later on decided not to use the OPC technology.
[209]    In my
opinion, it makes little sense to make a quote if the Limesoft product was no
where near capable of doing the job.  A simple reading of Ex. “279” makes it
clear that Limesoft is offering the continuous emissions monitoring system with
some immediacy.  All of the language is in the present, not future, tense.  It
refers to allowing 14 days for full system configuration and preparation and
that CEMS deployment usually takes 3-5 days.  If this quote was intended for
some indeterminate time in the far-off future, I find that it would have contained
language to that effect.  I completely reject Vlad’s evidence on that issue.
[210]    In Limesoft’s
August 25, 2011, quote (Ex. “280”) to CEM Specialties in London, the subject
was “continuous emission monitoring system”.  There is no reference to OPC UA. 
It does state that Limesoft is an OPC Foundation member. I note that Limesoft
had become a member of OPC Foundation in January 2011.  My comments with
respect to Ex. “279” applies to Ex. “280”.
[211]    The
quote dated August 9, 2011 (Ex. “281”) does refer to OPC UA.  Vlad says that
OPC UA was removed in August of 2011.  That claim appears substantiated by the
documents.
[212]    However,
the quote dated April 10, 2013, is regarding CEMS.  It states that it would be
using OPC Communications Protocol, but Vlad indicated that this was an add-on
that needed to be done to Limedas.  It was OPC Classic, not OPC UA.  He
testified that there was no OPC in Limedas at all.
[213]    Mr.
HelfinSiegel was qualified as an expert, without objection, in digital forensics. 
He conducts investigations in large software implementation failures, copyright
infringement and trade secret misappropriation and digital forensics.  He has
more than 16 years of experience as an IT professional, including system
administration, security and technical support.  For Reasons given in a
mid-trial ruling dated November 27, 2023, I permitted him to testify with
respect to all four reports that he prepared.
[214]    Mr.
HelfinSiegel examined Vlad’s Nexus laptop computer to look for evidence linking
ACT Group with the website Limesoft.unfuddle.com.  He made a digital copy of
Vlad’s laptop hard drive.  Mr. HelfinSiegel was able to recover deleted
internet history from the laptop showing visits to limedas.unfuddle.com
repositories.  These visits occurred in May, July and August of 2010.  Mr.
HelfinSiegel was able to recover the actual webpages visited for some of the
entries.
[215]    For
example, on May 18, 2010, at 3:01 pm, the ACT Group Inc. webpage was accessed
from Vlad’s Nexus laptop.  It was logged in as User “vlad”.  On
cross-examination, Mr. HelfinSiegel agreed that he can only see the User ID,
but cannot confirm whether the user was actually Vlad.  He agreed that people
can share passwords.
[216]    On
August 18, 2010, User “vlad” visited ACT Group Inc. Data Logger.  The person
accessed Ticket #8.  Data Logger is one of the Limedas products.  There was a
drop-down box that indicates “Create application business model, Modbus
Communication layer, DAS Desktop Client”.
[217]    There was
a Limedas_project back.xml file that the defendants produced in the litigation
from unfuddle.com.  It shows that on March 29, 2011, “Limesoft Inc.” replaced
ACT Group Inc. on Unfuddle.  It is Mr. HelfinSiegel’s opinion that from May 18,
2010, to August 18, 2010, ACT Group Inc.’s name appeared on the Unfuddle
webpages.  The title changed to Limesoft Inc. by March 29, 2011.
[218]    Mr.
HelfinSiegel also examined Vlad’s desktop computer at Nexus.  He examined a
Windows application event log which showed an installation.  The installation
was Google Apps Migration for Microsoft Outlook.  It was done on December 2,
2010, at 9:12:41 am.  This program allows a person to migrate emails from Microsoft
Outlook to another program.  On January 3, 2011, at 9:18:26 am, Google Apps
Migration was removed from Vlad’s Nexus desktop computer.
[219]    Mr.
HelfinSiegel recovered an xml file from Vlad’s desktop computer at Nexus.  It
was related to Google Apps Migration.  The Account is for nexus@actgroup.ca.  It shows that it was successful.  Vlad
transferred 1137 Nexus “contacts” emails from his Nexus email account to his
ACT Group email account on December 2, 2010.  He also transferred files from
his “inbox”, “resumes”, “SICK Germany”, “SICK Germany/Sent Items”, “OPC UA”,
“Protocols”, “Saudi Methanol AR-RAZI” and “Sent” folders.  It is Mr.
HelfinSiegel’s opinion that thousands of items from emails were successfully
migrated from Vlad’s desktop computer to Nexus@actgroup.ca.  5358
emails were transferred from the “Inbox” folder alone.  On cross-examination, Mr.
HelfinSiegel conceded that he was unable to say whether the emails were ever
successfully accessed or opened by someone using the nexus@actgroup.ca
account.
[220]    Mr.
HelfinSiegel also discovered on Vlad’s Nexus desktop computer an MsiInstaller. 
On July 28, 2010, “AnkhSVN 2.18420.8” was installed on Vlad’s desktop
computer.  This is a subversion client, which is a source code repository or
control system to keep track of changes to source code over time.  It allows a
person to access the source code control system.  AnkhSVN was removed from
Vlad’s desktop computer on December 23, 2010.
[221]    Mr.
HelfinSiegel also searched “RecentLog Messages” on the desktop computer.  These
are from Visual Studio 9.0, used to develop source code.  On July 28, 2010,
according to Vlad’s check-ins (Ex. “108”), the desktop and Unfuddle matched
precisely.  There were three repository check-ins from Vlad on the same date
that this was added.  There were other instances of exact matches between
Vlad’s check-ins and what was put on Unfuddle repository.  The User was always
“vlad”.
[222]    Mr.
HelfinSiegel testified that there was a registry repository for AnkhSVN visited
on Vlad’s desktop computer on November 23, 2010, at 3:21 pm.  There is an entry
regarding “limedas.unfuddle.com/svn/limedas_tools”, meaning that this site was
opened on Vlad’s desktop.
[223]    Another
registry entry on Vlad’s desktop (E:\dev\dcu\DCU.sln) is used for development. 
“DCU” is used for the file for the data logger repository. There was a
corresponding revision (r2) made by “vlad” by the same name in the Datalogger
repository.
[224]    There was
also a “Windows Error Report” on Vlad’s desktop computer.  It records “crashes”
of applications.  It was Mr. HelfinSiegel’s evidence that this means that there
were some crashes caused by the Limedas applications.    Specifically, the
“Limedas Data Logger.vshost.exe” was implicated in the crash on September 3,
2010.  This system is used for debugging programs used in development.  The
Application that was running was a development program when it crashed twice in
quick succession on Vlad’s desktop computer on September 3, 2010.
[225]    A SEC-WEST-CEMS
document was opened on November 16, 2010, in an external hard drive attached to
Vlad’s desktop computer.  On February 26, 2010, a data logger file was opened
from an external hard drive.  On August 4, 2010, an external hard drive
attached to the desktop accessed Medinah demo. On August 6, 2010, data logger
development code was accessed on the external hard drive attached to the
desktop.  There are many similar entries relating to Limedas products and SEC
WEST CEMS in 2010.  There was one for OPC Foundations on June 2, 2010.
[226]    Mr.
HelfinSiegel concluded from all of the above that it was much more likely than
not that Vlad’s Nexus desktop was used for the development of Limedas source
code.  There were commits made from the Nexus desktop to Limedas at Unfuddle. 
There is evidence of development work, but no specific evidence that source
code was written on the desktop.  There was, however, evidence suggestive of
code being written.  It was his view that it was more likely than not that
source code was written on the desktop computer because source code is usually
part of development.   Mr. HelfinSiegel suspects that there was source code
development because there was debugging apps run, there was a Limesoft crash
and subversion program (Ankh SVN).  The Visual Studio program found is also a
special executable program used in development work.  It makes little sense for
these to be found unless there was source code development.
[227]    Mr.
James was also qualified, on consent, to give expert evidence.  He is familiar
with subversion technology and “blame” subversion technology.  He was qualified
to provide opinion evidence with respect to computer engineering in two ways:
[228]    Mr.
James reviewed the seven source code repositories on Unfuddle.  He created a
chart (Ex. “212”) using software that showed the amount of source code in the
Unfuddle repositories over time.  This is from June 22, 2009, to March 29,
2011.  There were six contributors to source code, by username—Vlad, vlad,
Serge, serge, max, and mihail.  Most of the source code was committed before
March 29, 2011, and no code was committed after June 2011.  He agreed that the
chart could only show the username used to commit code, but not necessarily who
the actual person using the username was.
[229]    The
biggest contributor of source code, by far, was “Vlad”.  The second largest
contributor was “vlad” and then “serge” closely in third.  Mr. James also
agreed that some of the source code could have been created by a third-party. 
This means that part of the computer program or source code was written by
another developer and was then simply checked-in by the person using the
username.
[230]    On
cross-examination, Mr. James agreed that on Ex. “212”, there was a major jump
in the amount of code found between day 326 and day 339, added by “Vlad”.  This
was about 330,000 lines of code.  Another significant jump in the amount of
code was between days 235 and 248, where approximately 100,000 to 111,000 lines
of code were entered.  The majority of this code was a commit of OPC code.  A
third check-in by “vlad” on February 24, 2010, likely accounted for 50,000
lines of code.  These three specific lines of code totalled approximately
480,000 or 54.5% of the total code committed during the time frame.
[231]    Mr.
James agreed just because source code is committed to a repository, it does not
mean that the code is ultimately going to be used in the development of the
final project.  The developer may change paths in the development.  However, it
was Mr. James’ opinion that anything that was not going to be used is typically
removed.  He did not see any deletions of source code.  He only saw additions
and modifications, although he conceded that he was not asked to locate any
deletions.
[232]    Importantly,
Mr. James testified on cross-examination that he compared CEMView software with
the Limedas Datalogger software.  It was his opinion that the source code was
not the same.  The algorithms used were dissimilar.  The structures of the
files were dissimilar.  Although the data in these systems originates from
sensors, the data was dissimilar.  In his opinion, there was no evidence of
copying.
[233]    Mr.
James identified that “r2” in the OPC repository on April 27, 2010, was C#
code.  He was asked to examine the OPC repository on Unfuddle to determine how 
many of the files were connected to an OPC RCBL (Reciprocal Community Binary
License) License.  There were 308 such files out of 352 files had this license.
[234]    Mr.
Cosovic was one of the software developers at Nexus from July 2001 to May of
2013.  In this case, the Plaintiff called him for the purpose of tendering him
as an expert witness.  He worked with Vlad and Alexandre and was part of the
team developing CEMView.  He has since left Nexus but continues to work for a
software development company.  He is fluent in C# coding language.
[235]    In a
mid-trial ruling, I qualified Mr. Cosovic as an expert to examine software to
determine whether or not it was continuous emissions software.
[236]    Mr.
Cosovic was instructed by Joseph on how to install and operate the Limedas
software.  He was able to create a 6-min average, a 3-hour average and a 30-day
average.  He did not add any source code to the program.  He used the
precompiled version that was provided to him.  He testified that he was not
able to simulate the process running, but he was able to simulate the data that
would have come from an analyzer.
[237]    Mr.
Cosovic testified that he was able to generate 6-minute, 3-hour and 30-day
rolling averages when he ran the Limedas software.  The 3-hour rolling average
is a mandatory regulatory average in cement plants, for example.  The Limedas
software was also capable of generating 1-hour rolling averages, which is also
a regulatory average used in the field.  The software used 15-minute averages
to calculate the 1-hour average.  It uses 1-minute averages to calculate 6-minute
averages.  One day averages are used to calculate 30-day average.
[238]    In the
CEMS world, the 6-minute average is mandatory for measuring opacity in concrete
plants to ensure regulatory compliance.  The Limedas product was capable of
creating this 6-minute average.
[239]    The
Limedas product was capable of generating reports to show the data
measurements.
[240]    Based
on his experience, it was Mr. Cosovic’s opinion that Limedas was a fully
configurable CEM data acquisition system.  The system could obtain values from
gas analysers and the status of the gas analyzers.  It could qualify the data
that it acquired from the analyzers.  It could then be deemed valid or
invalid.  If valid, the data could be used to calculate the regulatory
averages.  If invalid, it could not be used.  A CEMS has to be able to track
daily calculations and calibration drift.  This determines whether the data is
valid or invalid.  In Mr. Cosovic’s opinion, all of the averages that Limedas
could calculate are important for continuous emission monitoring systems.
[241]    In
cross-examination, Mr. Cosovic was asked about rolling averages.  He compared a
rolling average to a block average.  For a rolling average, the last hour falls
off and the next hour is added on, if it is valid.  Ex. “158”, for example, was
titled “3-hour rolling average”.  However, he agreed that the report was
generating a chart that was showing every three hours, like a block average
would.  Mr. Cosovic maintains that he entered a 3-hour rolling average and did
not investigate why the program set out the chart in this fashion.  When he ran
the 30-day rolling averages, the chart omitted information.  He did not
investigate why that was the case.
[242]    He was
taken to the instructions he followed to generate the 3-hour rolling average. 
He followed the instructions and generated the reports.  He labelled the report
a “3-hour rolling average”.  The fact that he named it that way, does not mean
the report generated was actually a 3-hour rolling average.  He saw “AVG” in
one of the Limedas commits.  It is used to calculate the averages.  He used
3,600,000 milliseconds as the processing interval.  This is one hour.  He saw
this in a Limedas commit.  He did not see if the source code had been changed
since he saw it and the version he was using.  He did not look for an “rAVG
function”.  He does not know if the defendants used a separate function to
calculate rolling averages.
[243]    Mr.
Cosovic did not review the Limedas source code to see if the averages were
recorded in the database.  However, he felt that the data could be extracted
from the program to calculate the rolling averages manually.
[244]    However,
Vlad testified that r875, done on May 29, 2012, is where the source code was
added that allowed for rolling averages as defined in the US and Canadian
regulations.  If that is true, then Mr. Cosovic could not have generated the
rolling averages with the version of Limedas he was working with.
[245]    Mr.
Cosovic concluded that Limedas was capable of tracking the calibration drift
necessary for CEMS.  Calibration process is from an analyzer on a smokestack. 
A known concentration of the gas is sent up a probe on the analyzer, read and
calculations are done by a CEMS program about whether the reading was correct. 
There is a range of tolerance with known values.  A CEMS product can measure
this calibration drift.  Mr. Cosovic did not look for source code that would do
this in the Limedas program.  He did see some historical data, but he did not
try to run a calibration report.
[246]    Mr.
Cosovic was taken through a number of commits dated June 25, 2011, which he had
not seen before.  He agreed that he would not expect these entries if
calibration tracking was already in place prior to that time.  He agreed that
there was extensive work done in calibration in the summer of 2011, which would
be after the demo that he tested.
[247]    According
to Vlad, they started doing calibration drift in Limesoft programming in June
or July of 2011.   A corresponding entry in Vlad’s Limesoft timesheet (Ex.
“151”) shows that on June 25, 2011, he started implementing calibration drift
for Limedas.  By August 12, 2011, the system could generate a calibration
report.  He spent approximately 172 hours setting up the calibration tracking
from June 25, 2011, to August 12, 2011.  Vlad did this because Serge was not
familiar enough with the various International regulations.  This is shown in
the Limedas Repository at r396 as occurring on July 25, 2011, which states
“Implement USEPA (Control Chart) drift evaluation (#37)”.  This source code was
reviewed and is approximately 40 lines of source code.  Prior to that work
being completed, Vlad says that Limedas could not calculate calibration drift. 
Therefore, he says that they could not install the software as a Continuous
Emission Monitoring Software until that was done.
[248]    It was
put to Vlad that he was working on calibration drift as early as March 2011. 
Vlad says that was the first change to have a “mock up screen” to get the
client interested.  It was not actually implemented.  He denies that there was
any calibration source code prior to January 2011.  Vlad denies that GME 66
Calibration had anything to do with actual calibration.  It was just a name
assigned to that screen for marketing purposes.  It was a demo.  It was not the
product that would be implemented at the actual customer.  The Saudi Arabia
plants did not need calibration.
[249]    Vlad
conceded that the Limedas source code that was filed with the court in March of
2011 was a working installation at Medinah.  However, there was no calibration
possible in that product.  The averaging was possible, but not a rolling
average.  He then described it as a demo.
[250]    Mr.
Whiteside has worked as a consultant engineer on emissions monitoring
software.  He would configure systems for individual customers and amends
software.  He reviews source code and has written some source code.  He has
co-authored data acquisition standards for emissions.  I qualified him as an
expert in CEMS software.
[251]    Mr.
Whiteside described that CEMS data acquisition software is intended to collect
information from analyzers and store it to produce reports for regulatory
authorities.  There are analyzers with their own software.  The regulations
vary quite considerably from jurisdiction to jurisdiction.  The software has to
be re-written for each site.  Now configurable software is available, and a
programmer just needs to tell the software the rules.  Overall, the
requirements are similar.  It is about air quality.  The sites have to
calculate the total pollutants emitted over time.  Local regulations may limit
emission levels.  Each site has its own permit.
[252]    Mr.
Whiteside was provided with source code from Limesoft’s SVN database.  He
extracted the software versions of Limedas—Versions 1, 1.1, 1.3, 1.4 and 1.5.  He
conducted a keyword search in the database.  Certain keywords did not appear in
version 1.3 but did appear in 1.4 and 1.5.  He focussed on differences between
1.3 and 1.4.  There was not much difference between 1.4 and 1.5.  The switch
between 1.3 and 1.4 occurred on July 7, 2011.  This is when the later version
was released.
[253]    Mr.
Whiteside described the difference between a rolling average and a block or
fixed average.  For a rolling average, every one minute get an average of the
preceding 60 minutes.  Rolling averages are important where conditions that are
being monitored may change quickly.  When he conducted his keyword search, the rolling
average capability was not found in version 1.3 but were found in version 1.4. 
Rolling averages are required in various regions broadly. For rolling hours, in
the US, each hour takes the preceding 180 samples.  The difference between
rolling and fixed, is it gets updated at input for rolling.  The software has
to be able to tell it what to do.
[254]    A
quadrant is a time period, a section of any specific clock hour.  There are
four quadrants to every hour.  A quadrant is a US requirement in particular, to
comply with their regulations.  There must be one valid data point per quadrant
while the plant is in operation.  Otherwise, under those regulations it is not a
valid hourly average.  This is unique to the United States.  The defendants
software had quadrant averages but not in version 1.3.  It was in version 1.4. 
Quadrants were added on December 17, 2011.  However, he conceded that quadrants
are not required broadly, and he has only seen it in the US regulations.
[255]    Mr.
Whiteside described calibration drift.  Analyzers have to be very sensitive. 
Calibration tests are used to get a zero reading to check performance of the analyzer. 
The regulations vary about what the permissible calibration drift is.  In CEMS,
if calibration is off, the regulatory authorities cannot tell if regulatory
limits are being exceeded.  It is accepted that analyzers have a level of
uncertainty.  Each region allows a permissible drift from the certainty.  The
defendants’ software could do calibration drift calculations in version 1.4
that complied with USA and European regulation in version 1.4.  This was not
present in version 1.3.  Thus, this was added July 25, 2011, and December 29,
2011.
[256]    On
cross-examination, Mr. Whiteside agreed that cement kilns need rolling
averages.  He testified that in CEMS, calibration includes a multitude of
areas.  When they first build a plant and install CEMS, it is compared with a
reference method.  They install a probe and analyze the chemicals to get a
chemical concentration for each component.  This produces a chart for
comparison.  Alternatively, they can do ongoing calibrations to continuously
check analyzers to ensure they are still working.
[257]    Mr.
Whiteside’s report was done using a keyword analysis.  He conceded that there
are more thorough ways to do this analysis.  He had not seen the Limedas
executable program filed with the court in March of 2011 that Mr. Cosovic had
run.  Mr. Whiteside agreed that it would be helpful to use the executable to
actually run the programs, but it would take some time.  Looking at executable,
like Mr. Cosovic had done, would have been more thorough.  He was not asked to
do the executable, just the keyword search.  He had not seen Mr. Cosovic’s
report.
[258]    Mr.
Whiteside concluded that rolling averages, quadrants and calibration drift were
all done after version 1.3 because there were no keyword hits until version 1.4. 
He started looking at 1.5 and went backwards.  1.4 had the same as 1.5.  There
were no hits in 1.3.  He did not include the date version 1.3 started.  But he
says not a lot of work was done before version 1.4.
[259]    After
going through Ex. “108”, he agreed that calibration was being developed as of
March 2011.  There would be configurable calibration figures.  These commits
are inconsistent with calibration not being there before July 2011.  His
keyword search dealt with US and European standards because they are very
specific.  So therefore, his search was not exhaustive.  A start-up that might
want to branch out and add US and European regimes might add for version 1.4. 
Having said that, he is not able to say whether the calibration functionality was
working or a prototype.  He would need to see the code or if any subsequent
changes.
[260]    Mr.
Whiteside testified that if OPC was removed, there would generally be a new
version number because they would want people to know that the software had
been changed.   I note that Serge testified that OPC UA ANSI stack was taken
out over the summer of 2010.  It was not really useful so he “cleaned it up”. 
By March of 2011, he testified that it was all gone.  293 DL of Ex. “108” showed
“serge” removing OPC UA ANSI stack on August 18, 2010.  Serge had testified
that he was initially interested in OPC UA, but it was not working well so took
it out.  He still had OPC UA when he presented his project because he could not
change last minute.
[261]    Serge
testified that Limedas completely removed OPC UA by May of 2011 and it was not
being used by Limedas for any functionality.  Commits 836, 839 and 844 show
Serge removing OPC UA.  He left it in where the data is moved between the
client and the server.  He eventually got rid of this too.
[262]    I note
that the Unfuddle repositories show, in r158, “OPC UA is no longer required. 
The server will be recreated”.  Serge testified that on May 25, 2011, he
removed OPC UA from the software, creating version 1.3.
[263]    Mr.
Whiteside testified that subversion allows a source code control system to
reproduce an earlier version.  It does not allow you to include changes that
were made to a later version.  Prior versions are preserved.
[264]    Generally,
I found Joseph to be a credible witness.  However, he frequently gave
unnecessarily long-winded answers, both during examination-in-chief and during
cross-examination.  It was not my impression that he did so to be obstructive. 
Rather, my impression was that he has a lot of specialized knowledge about Nexus
and CEMView, and he simply over-explained it to the court.
[265]    I
thought, however, that he failed to make his point about the decrease in Vlad’s
commits in 2009 and 2010 demonstrating that Vlad was not devoting sufficient
time to Nexus as falling short.  He should have recognized, in my view, that
his analysis failed to consider commits that would be done under a different username,
like “support” or “developer”.  I do not think he was trying to mislead I
simply do not think he considered that possibility.
[266]    I have
described that Joseph was a demanding employer.  Some of his emails struck me
as overly disrespectful to his staff, but he was the boss and was, in my
opinion, entitled to be demanding.  Thus, these emails, even if I disapprove of
their tone, did not diminish Joseph’s credibility.
[267]    There
is no doubt that Joseph feels betrayed by Vlad.  I also recognize that this
lawsuit has been going on for many years, has been hard fought and there is no
love lost between the litigants.  Each of Joseph and Vlad took a few “cheap
shots” at the other that I do not believe the evidence bore out.  As noted, I
do not impute an improper motive to Joseph for expressing his views to the PEO,
particularly since this is before he discovered Vlad’s role with Limesoft.
[268]    I
harbour some suspicion about whether Joseph’s claim that when he first heard of
Limesoft he called in all the developers into a meeting and that he later saw
the Limedas demo running on Vlad’s computer.  Vlad denies that either of these
occurred.  I prefer Joseph’s testimony over Vlad’s, for reasons I will explain,
but it struck me as surprising that no emails that went out to all of the
Nexus’ programmers would have been adduced into evidence given the quantify of
emails tendered.  Frankly, it is my view that little turns on whether such a
meeting occurred, of if Joseph saw the Limedas demo running on Vlad’s computer.
[269]    Serge
and Vlad are obviously intelligent men and were able to provide a lot of complicated
detail about the software development and CEMS, much like Joseph.  Frankly, it
was impossible for the court to gauge what was accurate given my own scant
knowledge about the subject matter of this litigation.
[270]    I
thought that Vlad testified in a relatively calm fashion, although I noted that
he became defensive on two or three occasions.  That is not unexpected during
cross-examination given the allegations in this case.
[271]    Similarly,
I thought that Serge remained composed throughout his testimony.
[272]    As
noted, I thought Vlad attempted to land some low blows.  He emphasized the
negative work atmosphere at Nexus, without acknowledging some of the perks.  He
immediately admitted on cross-examination that his examination-in-chief about
all the Sue-Tangs and Alex having nice offices was not true and that only
Joseph had an office and the rest of them had a cubicle like he did.  That
seemed like a needless untruth.  I noted that he was combative at this point in
the cross-examination when he was called out on this.
[273]    As
noted, I have decided that deciding whether Vlad misrepresented his educational
qualifications to the PEO is a distraction in an already complicated case. 
Thus, while there is reason to be skeptical, I place no weight on the PEO hearsay
evidence or the translated documents, except for Vlad’s shifting narrative
about his experience.
[274]    However,
that shifting narrative is noteworthy.  In the context of the lawsuit, Vlad
downplayed his independence, describing himself as a “data entry” clerk.  This contrasts
with his letter to the PEO about having worked as a software engineer for ten
years including his time at Nexus and his letter as a reference for a co-worker
in which he described himself as a manager.  He also clearly suggested to SICK
that he was intimately involved in all of the Nexus CEMView development.
[275]    Vlad
initially indicated that he was not aware of the migration of emails from his
Nexus computer to ACT Group but then tried to explain that he was simply trying
to retrieve personal information was not believable.
[276]    Even
the timing of Vlad’s letter to SICK on January 25, 2011, mere weeks after
leaving Nexus, and offering Limedas as an alternative to CEMView completely
undermines his evidence that he was not developing a competing product while at
Nexus.
[277]    Serge’s
explanation for using an Ottawa address on the Limesoft website to give the
appearance of prestige in case anyone checked the address was completely and
utterly non-sensical given that the Ottawa address was observably not more
prestigious than his mother’s home.  That answer hurt Serge’s credibility considerably
in my view and certainly makes me believe that the Ottawa address was used to
keep Limesoft’s existence secret from Nexus.